Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.065

Duties of educational service districts—Collaboration with workforce development councils.

(1) Educational service districts, in collaboration with area workforce development councils, shall:

(a) Provide technical assistance to local partnerships established under a grant awarded under RCW 28A.175.025 in collecting and using performance data; and

(b) At the request of a local partnership established under a grant awarded under RCW 28A.175.025, provide assistance in the development of a functional sustainability plan, including the identification of potential funding sources for future operation.

(2) Local partnerships established under a grant awarded under RCW 28A.175.025 may contract with an educational service district, workforce development council, or a private agency for specialized training in such areas as cultural competency, identifying diverse learning styles, and intervention strategies for students at risk of dropping out of school.

[ 2007 c 408 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Findings—2007 c 408: See note following RCW 28A.175.025.